Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 7. Determination of Adequacy of Service by Telegraph and Telephone Companies.

§ 77-3-401.
Determination of adequacy of service initiated by petition of attorney general.

Upon the petition therefor by the attorney general, the Mississippi public service commission shall have jurisdiction to determine, after reasonable notice and hearing, whether any domestic telephone or telegraph public service corporation operating under the jurisdiction of the commission, is rendering in a reasonably adequate manner the public service authorized by its charter of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7704; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-403.
Notice to corporation to appear before commission.

Upon the filing of a petition therefor by the attorney general with the public service commission, notice shall be given any such corporation requiring the corporation to appear before the commission at a day certain, not less than thirty (30) days, and to show cause why it should not be required within a reasonable time, not less than sixty days after such hearing, to obey the order of the commission made on such hearing. A copy of the petition shall be attached to such notice. Such notice shall be served by mailing it by registered United States mail to any executive officer of such corporation at his usual post office address.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7705; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-405.
Distinct findings of fact to be made by commission.

Upon the hearing, the testimony shall be taken by the official stenographer of the commission. The commission shall make distinct findings of fact as to: (1) whether the corporation is or is not rendering in a reasonably adequate manner the public service authorized by the corporate charter of such corporation; (2) if not, what would be reasonably necessary to be done to make such service reasonably adequate; (3) whether by reason of its financial condition, such corporation may be reasonably expected to make such changes as would be reasonably necessary to make such service reasonably adequate; (4) what would be a reasonable time, not less than sixty (60) days, within which such changes should be made.

The findings of fact by the commission if supported by substantial evidence, shall be conclusive, and shall not be reversed by any court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7706; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-407.
Issuance of order requiring changes in service.

If the commission shall find that the corporation may reasonably be expected to make changes in its service, which will render such service reasonably adequate, and shall specify such reasonable changes, and shall fix a time within which changes may be made, then the order of the commission shall be to such extent. If such changes are not made within the time fixed by the commission, the commission shall have authority to forfeit the charter of such corporation, upon five (5) days notice, and a hearing accorded upon the forfeiture. If the commission shall find that the corporation cannot reasonably be expected to make the necessary changes in its service which will render such service reasonably adequate, for reasons stated in the order, then the commission shall have the authority at such time to enter an order forfeiting the corporate charter of such corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7707; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-409.
Removal of proceedings to circuit court.

The attorney general, or the corporation, may by certiorari out of the circuit court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, within ten (10) days from the date of the order in the hearing provided in Section 77-3-403, remove the entire proceeding to such court, which removal shall not operate as a supersedeas. No supersedeas shall be allowed, but the circuit court or the circuit judge in vacation shall examine the record for errors of law. If the said court shall find no errors of law, the order shall be affirmed. If errors of law appear, it shall be reversed, and such reversal shall operate as a stay of such order, and no subsequent action on the charter forfeiture shall be taken by the commission on such order, but the cause shall be remanded to the commission with directions for a new hearing, or dismissed, as the circuit court finds appropriate by reason of errors of law appearing on the face of the record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7708; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-411.
Forfeiture of charter for failure to make changes.

If no proceedings are taken under Section 77-3-409, then at the expiration of ten (10) days from the date of such order, such order shall become final, from which no appeal shall lie, and the findings set out in such order shall be conclusively presumed to be correct. Unless the commission is satisfied the changes required by such order have been made within the time prescribed in such order, the commission shall give the notice of five (5) days, as provided in Section 77-3-407, and upon the hearing the commission shall determine whether such changes have or have not been made, as required. If the commission find that such changes have not been made as required, then it shall enter an order incorporating such finding, and forfeiting the charter of such corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7709; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-413.
Certiorari to circuit court.

At any time within ten (10) days of the entry of the order forfeiting or refusing to forfeit such charter, the attorney general or the corporation may apply to the circuit court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, for a writ of certiorari, which, if granted, shall have the effect of transferring the record of the last proceeding to the circuit court. The circuit court, or the circuit judge in vacation, shall examine such record for errors of law. If the said court shall find no errors of law, the order shall be affirmed. If errors of law appear, the order shall be reversed and such reversal shall operate as a stay of such order, and the cause shall be remanded to the commission with directions for a new hearing, or dismissal, as the circuit court finds proper from the examination of the record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7710; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-415.
Appeal from judgment of circuit court.

Appeals from the order of the circuit court affirming or reviewing such order may be taken as other appeals are taken to the supreme court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7711; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-417.
Effect of receivership proceedings.

Receivership proceedings at any stage in any court shall not affect any proceedings under the terms of this article. When a petition is filed under the terms of this article, exclusive jurisdiction shall be vested in the public service commission, and any pending receivership shall immediately be terminated, and the trustees shall be appointed by the commission under the terms of Section 77-3-419.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7712; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-419.
Liquidation of business.

All of the provisions of Chapter 35 of Title 11 of the Mississippi Code of 1972 relative to the liquidation of corporations after forfeiture of charter shall apply to the liquidation of any such corporation if the charter thereof is forfeited under the terms of this article, except that the trustees shall be appointed by the public service commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7713; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-421.
Operations within same territory by second company following forfeiture of first company’s charter.

After the entry of an order forfeiting the charter of incorporation of any telephone or telegraph company, no telephone or telegraph company, whether operated by a person, co-partnership or corporation, shall have the authority to enter the same territory, or any part of it, served by the corporation whose charter has been forfeited, until a certificate of public convenience and necessity is granted by the public service commission, which certificate shall not be granted unless the commission affirmatively finds that the applicant therein is financially able to render telephone or telegraph service within such territory in a reasonably adequate manner. The application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be in such form as the commission may require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7714; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-423.
Necessity that sales, leases or transfers be made to company capable of providing adequate service.

No sale, lease or transfer of any franchises or properties within Mississippi, or any part thereof, of any domestic telephone or telegraph company, whether operated by a person, firm or corporation, shall be valid unless, upon a hearing after reasonable notice, the commission shall find that the person, firm or corporation to whom such sale, lease or transfer is proposed to be made is financially and otherwise capable of rendering telephone or telegraph service in a reasonably adequate manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7714; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.

§ 77-3-425.
Continuation of service in event of sale of business.

In the event any domestic telephone or telegraph company has, within eighteen months prior to May 7, 1940, sold, leased or transferred any of its franchises or properties within the State of Mississippi, then that person, firm or corporation to whom such properties were sold, leased or transferred, or any successor in title thereto, shall be under the obligation to render such telephone or telegraph service in a reasonably adequate manner, and the commission shall have the authority, upon petition of the attorney general, to proceed to investigate the operation of the telephone or telegraph business of the vendee, lessee or transferee, or any successor in title, in the same manner as is provided for in this article as to the domestic corporations. If the commission shall find, after such hearing as provided for domestic corporations, that such vendee, lessee or transferee, or any successor in title, is not rendering such service in a reasonably adequate manner, then the commission shall have the authority to require such changes to be made as it could in the case of domestic corporations, and if such changes are not made as required by the commission, then the commission shall have the authority to forfeit the right of such vendee, lessee, transferee, or any successor in title thereto, to operate a telephone or telegraph business. If the commission shall find that such vendee, lessee, transferee, or any successor in title, cannot be reasonably expected to render such service in a reasonably adequate manner, then the commission shall have the authority to forfeit the right of such vendee, lessee or transferee, or any successor in title, to operate a telephone or telegraph business within Mississippi, and shall appoint trustees for such business, as provided for in Section 77-3-419.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7715; Laws, 1940, ch. 132.